District of Columbia statutes.
50-2201.04b

Operation of all-terrain vehicles and dirt bikes.

(a)

No person shall operate at any time an all-terrain vehicle or dirt bike on public property including any public space in the District.

(b)

All-terrain vehicles or dirt bikes shall not be registered with the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(c)

Any individual violating any provision of this section shall upon conviction be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned not more than 30 days, or both. All such prosecutions shall be in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia upon information filed by the Attorney General of the District of Columbia or any of his assistants in the name of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 3, 1925, ch. 443, § 9b
as added Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-289, § 2(d), 52 DCR 1446
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 102(d), 59 DCR 12957
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 271(b), 60 DCR 2064
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 substituted “$250” for “$1,000” in (c).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1000 [$250]” in (c).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 102(d) of Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-429, July 30, 2012, 59 DCR 9387).
For temporary amendment of (c), see § 102(d) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12774).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 102(d) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 271(b) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 102(d) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.